Utah statutes.
9-10-108.   Deposits into fund -- Unallocated balance nonlapsing.

(1) (a)  All money received under Section 59-5-116 shall be deposited in the Revitalization Fund provided that no business or activity fee or tax based on gross receipts has been imposed by a county or the Tribe on oil and gas activities.

(b) (i)  Nothing in this Subsection (1) prohibits a county from imposing a charge described in Subsection (1)(a) with respect to any gathering, transmission, or local distribution pipeline in which the county owns an interest.

(ii)  Nothing in this Subsection (1) prohibits the Tribe from imposing a charge described in Subsection (1)(a) with respect to any gathering, transmission, or local distribution pipeline in which the Tribe owns an interest.

(2)  Any unallocated balance in the fund at the end of each fiscal year shall be nonlapsing.

